Hawaii statutes.
[§150A-12] Citation and summons. There
shall be printed a form of citation and summons for use in citing violators
warning the person to appear and answer the charge against the person at a
certain place and at a time within seven days after the citation. The citation
and summons shall be so designed to include all necessary information to make
it valid and legal within the laws and rules of the State. The form and
contents of such citation and summons shall be adopted or prescribed by the
district courts.

In every case when a citation and summons is
issued, the original of the same shall be given to the accused; provided that
the district courts may prescribe the issuance to the accused of a carbon copy
of the citation and summons and provide for the disposition of the original and
any other copies.

Every citation and summons shall be
consecutively numbered and each carbon copy shall bear the number of its
original. [L 1985, c 133, §7]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next